Idaho, session 2026, S1388.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Department of Correction the following
amounts to be expended according to the designated programs and expense
classes from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30,
2027:
FOR FOR
OPERATING CAPITAL
EXPENDITURES OUTLAY TOTAL
I. MANAGEMENT SERVICES:
FROM:
Inmate Labor
Fund $511,800 $511,800
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 0 $30,900 30,900
TOTAL $511,800 $30,900 $542,700
II. STATE PRISONS:
A. PRISONS ADMINISTRATION:
FROM:
Inmate Labor
Fund $177,200 $177,200
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 0 $35,000 35,000
TOTAL $177,200 $35,000 $212,200


FOR FOR
OPERATING CAPITAL
EXPENDITURES OUTLAY TOTAL
B. IDAHO STATE CORRECTIONAL INSTITUTION - BOISE:
FROM:
Inmate Labor
Fund $235,500 $235,500
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 0 $665,000 665,000
TOTAL $235,500 $665,000 $900,500
C. IDAHO STATE CORRECTIONAL CENTER - BOISE:
FROM:
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund $186,700 $186,700
D. IDAHO CORRECTIONAL INSTITUTION - OROFINO:
FROM:
Inmate Labor
Fund $8,800 $8,800
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 0 $70,000 70,000
TOTAL $8,800 $70,000 $78,800
E. IDAHO MAXIMUM SECURITY INSTITUTION - BOISE:
FROM:
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund $10,000 $10,000
F. NORTH IDAHO CORRECTIONAL INSTITUTION - COTTONWOOD:
FROM:
Inmate Labor
Fund $20,000 $20,000
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 0 $29,600 29,600
TOTAL $20,000 $29,600 $49,600


FOR FOR
OPERATING CAPITAL
EXPENDITURES OUTLAY TOTAL
G. SOUTH IDAHO CORRECTIONAL INSTITUTION - BOISE:
FROM:
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund $15,000 $15,000
H. ST. ANTHONY WORK CAMP:
FROM:
Inmate Labor
Fund $10,600 $10,600
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 0 $26,400 26,400
TOTAL $10,600 $26,400 $37,000
I. POCATELLO WOMEN'S CORRECTIONAL CENTER:
FROM:
Inmate Labor
Fund $4,500 $4,500
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 0 $146,900 146,900
TOTAL $4,500 $146,900 $151,400
J. MOUNTAIN VIEW TRANSFORMATION CENTER:
FROM:
Inmate Labor
Fund $104,500 $104,500
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 0 $409,400 409,400
TOTAL $104,500 $409,400 $513,900
DIVISION TOTAL $561,100 $1,594,000 $2,155,100
III. COUNTY & OUT-OF-STATE PLACEMENT:
FROM:
General
Fund $22,893,200 $22,893,200


FOR FOR
OPERATING CAPITAL
EXPENDITURES OUTLAY TOTAL
IV. COMMUNITY CORRECTIONS:
A. COMMUNITY SUPERVISION:
FROM:
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund $40,600 $40,600
B. COMMUNITY REENTRY CENTERS:
FROM:
Inmate Labor
Fund $12,000 $12,000
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 0 $812,200 812,200
TOTAL $12,000 $812,200 $824,200
DIVISION TOTAL $12,000 $852,800 $864,800
V. MEDICAL SERVICES:
FROM:
General
Fund $6,367,900 $6,367,900
GRAND TOTAL $30,346,000 $2,477,700 $32,823,700
SECTION 2. In addition to the appropriation made in Section 1, Chap-
ter 39, Laws of 2025, and any other appropriation provided by law, there is
hereby appropriated to the Department of Correction the following amounts to
be expended for the designated programs for operating expenditures from the
listed funds for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026:
I. MANAGEMENT SERVICES
FROM:
Hepatitis-C Fund $424,300
II. COUNTY & OUT-OF-STATE PLACEMENT:
FROM:
General Fund $14,140,500


III. MEDICAL SERVICES:
FROM:
General Fund $3,237,900
GRAND TOTAL $17,802,700
SECTION 3. REENTRY CENTER SERVICE DELIVERY REVIEW. The Department of
Correction shall gather all necessary information and initiate a request for
information to evaluate the most efficient and effective operation of Idaho
community reentry centers, including potential outsourcing models. In ad-
dition to cost, the procurement process shall consider recidivism outcomes
and security considerations. The department shall report its findings to
the Joint Finance-Appropriations Committee no later than November 1, 2026.
The format of the report and the contents therein shall be determined by the
Legislative Services Office Budget and Policy Analysis Division.
SECTION 4. CONDITIONS, LIMITATIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS. Appropriations
made pursuant to this act are subject to the conditions, limitations, and re-
strictions specified in this act.
SECTION 5. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, Section 2 of this act shall be in full force and effect on
and after passage and approval, and Sections 1, 3, and 4 of this act shall be
in full force and effect on and after July 1, 2026.